Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.130

District board—Powers generally.

In addition to other powers provided for under this chapter, the board has the following powers:

(1) To perform all acts necessary to assure that the purposes of this chapter will be carried out fairly and efficiently;

(2) To acquire, build, construct, repair, own, maintain, and operate any necessary stations retransmitting visual and aural signals intended to be received by the general public, relay stations, pickup stations, or any other electrical or electronic system necessary. However, the board has no power to originate programs;

(3) To make contracts to compensate any owner of land or other property for the use of such property for the purposes of this chapter;

(4) To make contracts with the United States, or any state, municipality, or any department or agency of those entities for carrying out the general purposes for which the district is formed;

(5) To acquire by gift, devise, bequest, lease, or purchase real and personal property, tangible or intangible, including lands, rights-of-way, and easements, necessary or convenient for its purposes;

(6) To make contracts of any lawful nature (including labor contracts or those for employees' benefits), employ engineers, laboratory personnel, attorneys, other technical or professional assistants, and any other assistants or employees necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

(7) To contract indebtedness or borrow money and to issue warrants or bonds to be paid from district revenues. The bonds, warrants, or other obligations may be in any form, including bearer or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030. Moreover, such warrants and bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW;

(8) To prescribe excise tax rates for providing services throughout the area in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

(9) To assist the county treasurer in sending tax notices to taxpayers pursuant to RCW 36.95.160; and

(10) To apply for, accept, and be the holder of any permit or license issued by or required under federal or state law.

[ 2013 c 191 s 2; 1985 c 76 s 2; 1983 c 167 s 102; 1980 c 100 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 13.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.